Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.170

Quotas—Transfer of—Limitations.

Quotas provided for in this chapter may not in any way be transferred without the consent of the director. Regulations regarding transfer of quotas shall be determined by the department after due notice and the opportunity for a hearing as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW. Any contract for the transfer of quotas, unless the transfer has previously been approved by the director, shall be null and void. The director shall make rules and regulations to preclude any person from using a corporation as a device to evade the provisions of this section. The quotas assigned to any producer shall become null and void as of any time the producer does not own the means of production to which the quotas pertain. Quotas shall in no event be considered as property and may be taken or abolished by the state without compensation.

[ 1991 c 239 s 12; 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 17.]